Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-234
Domestic stock company; change to mutual company; plan; requirements.

The board of directors shall submit to the Director of Insurance:

(1) Two copies of the proposed amendments to its articles of incorporation as provided for in section 44-231, duly certified by the secretary of the company, for filing in the office of the director and as many additional copies thereof as there are shareholders of the company;

(2) Two copies of a comprehensive plan for the mutualization of the company as approved by the board of directors, duly certified by the secretary of the company, for filing in the office of the director and as many additional copies thereof or copies of an adequate summary of the plan as there are shareholders of the company; and

(3) A complete list of the shareholders of the company showing the name of, number of shares owned by, and the latest address of each shareholder as shown by the company's records.

Laws 1953, c. 152, § 2, p. 480;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 80.